Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2922
Negative animal, herd, or flock, defined.

Negative animal, herd, or flock means any animal, herd, or flock which has been tested and found negative to an official test.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 22.